test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: blikk
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: blikk
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: blikki
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: bliks
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: blikk
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: blikk
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: blikkum
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: blikka
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: blikkið
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: blikkið
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: blikkinum
    blikk+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: bliksins
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: blikkini
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: blikkini
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: blikkunum
    blikk+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: blikkanna
